District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-303.05

Sole source procurement.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 305, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(m), 44 DCR 1423
Mar. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-83, § 2, 49 DCR 196
Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2040, Pub. L. 109-356, § 304
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1183.5.

Editor's Notes

Restrictions on renewal or extension of sole source contracts: Section 123 of Pub. L. 104-194, 110 Stat. 2367, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided that no sole source contract with the District of Columbia government or any agency thereof may be renewed or extended without opening that contract to the competitive bidding process as set forth in § 1-1183.3 § 2-303.03, 2001 Ed., except that the District of Columbia Public Schools may renew or extend sole source contracts for which competition is not feasible or practical, provided that the determination as to whether to invoke the competitive bidding process has been made in accordance with duly promulgated Board of Education rules and procedures.